Utah statutes.
76-6-410.5.   Theft of a rental vehicle.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that is intended primarily for use and operation on the highways.

(b)  "Rental agreement" means any written agreement stating the terms and conditions governing the use of a motor vehicle provided by a rental company.

(c)  "Rental company" means any person or organization in the business of providing motor vehicles to the public.

(d)  "Renter" means any person or organization obtaining the use of a motor vehicle from a rental company under the terms of a rental agreement.

(2)  A renter is guilty of theft of a rental vehicle if, without notice to and permission of the rental company, the renter knowingly fails without good cause to return the vehicle within 72 hours after the time established for the return in the rental agreement.

(3)  If the motor vehicle is not rented on a periodic tenancy basis, the rental company shall include the following information, legibly written, as part of the terms of the rental agreement:

(a)  the date and time the motor vehicle is required to be returned; and

(b)  the maximum penalties under state law if the motor vehicle is not returned within 72 hours from the date and time stated in compliance with Subsection (3)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 112, 2001 General Session

